Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 14A O.S. 2021, Section 2-211, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 410, O.S.L. 2025 (14A O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2-211), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-211. A. With respect to all sales, service, and


lease transactions including, but not limited to, any consumer


credit sales transaction, a discount which a seller offers, allows,


or otherwise makes available for the purpose of inducing payment by


cash, check, debit card, or similar means rather than by use of a


credit card shall not constitute a credit service charge as


determined under Section 2-109 of this title if the discount is


offered to all prospective buyers clearly and conspicuously in


accordance with regulations of the Administrator of Consumer Credit.

Req. No. 3228 Page 1


There shall be no limit on the discount that may be offered by the


seller. Pursuant to the regulations of the Administrator, a seller


who provides a discount not in accordance with regulations shall


disclose such information to the Administrator.


B. No seller may impose a surcharge on a cardholder who elects


to pay using a credit card instead of paying by cash, check, debit


card, or similar means unless the seller complies with the following


requirements:


1. Notice displaying the amount of the surcharge applicable


shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at the point of entry and


the point of sale for in-person transactions and the home page and


the point-of-sale webpage for online transactions. Notice,


including all required information, shall be verbally disclosed to


the customer for transactions processed over the phone; and


2. No surcharge shall exceed two percent (2%) four percent (4%)


of the total transaction or the actual amount to be charged to the


person or retailer to process the credit card transaction, whichever


is less. A customer shall not be considered to have chosen to use a


credit card as a method of payment under this section if, at the


time of the transaction, the person or retailer accepts only credit


cards as payment.


C. A seller who is registered with the United States Department


of the Treasury as a money transmitter pursuant to 31 C.F.R.,


Section 103.41, and who provides an electronic funds transmission

Req. No. 3228 Page 2


service, including service by telephone and the Internet, may charge


a different price for a funds transmission service based on the mode


of transmission used in the transaction without violating this


section so long as the price charged for a service paid for with an


open-end credit card or debit card account is not greater than the


price charged for such service if paid for with currency or other


similar means accepted within the same mode of transmission.


D. Any seller subject to the provisions of subsection C of this


section shall either conduct business at a location in this state or


comply with the provisions of Section 1022 of Title 18 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


E. As used in this section:


1. “Credit card” means any instrument or device, whether known


as a credit card, credit plate, charge card, or by any other name,


issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of the


cardholder in money, goods or services, or anything of value on


credit;


2. “Seller” means any person, entity, or retailer doing


business in this state in any sales, service, or lease transaction


including, but not limited to, any consumer credit sales


transaction; and


3. “Surcharge” means any additional amount imposed by a person,


entity, or retailer at the time of a credit card transaction that



Req. No. 3228 Page 3


increases the amount of the transaction for the use of a credit card


as payment.


F. For purposes of this section, a private educational


institution as defined in paragraph (e) of Section 3102 of Title 70


of the Oklahoma Statutes, a private school defined as a nonpublic


entity conducting an educational program for at least one grade


between prekindergarten through twelve, a municipality as defined in


paragraph 5 of Section 1-102 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes or


a public trust with a municipality as its beneficiary may charge a


service fee. The service fee shall be limited to bank processing


fees and financial transaction fees, the cost of providing for


secure transaction, portal fees, and fees necessary to compensate


for increased bandwidth incurred as a result of providing the


transaction.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3228 CAD 1/15/2026 11:53:13 AM















Req. No. 3228 Page 4